Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1509
Farming, defined.

Farming shall mean the cultivation of land for the production of agricultural crops, the raising of poultry, the production of eggs, the production of milk, the production of fruit or other horticultural crops, and grazing or the production of livestock. Farming shall not include the production of timber, forest products, nursery products, or sod, and farming shall not include a contract under which a processor or distributor of farm products or supplies provides spraying, harvesting, or other farm services.

Laws 1981, LB 9, § 3.